Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2534.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 28A.225.216 and 2019 c 72 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) A child of a military family complies with the residency requirements for enrollment in a school district if ((a parent of the child is transferred to, or is)), as a result of a parent's active duty status, call to active duty, or notification of an impending call or order to active duty, the child relocates to Washington and the child's military parent is:(i) Transferred to, or has received official notice of a pending transfer to, a military installation located within the state ((while on active duty pursuant to official military orders))of Washington;(ii) Transferred to, or has received official notice of a pending transfer to, a military installation located in a state bordering Washington; or(iii) Relocating due to a military exigency, for example overseas deployment, sea duty, or other mobilization.(b) A parent of the child must provide the school district with a copy of official military orders or other documentation issued by the appropriate military authority confirming the directed move.(c) A parent of the child must provide to the school district proof of the child's residence in the school district within ((fourteen))90 calendar days of ((the arrival date provided on official military documentation))enrollment. The parent may use the address of any of the following as proof of residence in the school district:(i) A temporary ((on-base billeting facility))lodging within the school district where the military family is expecting to obtain permanent housing;(ii) A purchased or leased residence, or a signed purchase and sale agreement or lease agreement for a residence; or(iii) Any federal government housing or off-base military housing, including off-base military housing that may be provided through a public-private venture.(2)(a) A school district shall accept, on a conditional basis, an application for enrollment and course registration, including enrollment in a specific school or program within the school district, ((by electronic means for children of military families who meet the requirements of subsection (1)(a) of this section))from a child of a military family who meets the requirements of subsection (1)(a) of this section, prior to the child arriving in Washington or a bordering state. A school district shall accept applications submitted by any reasonable means, including electronic transmission or mail. School districts must provide military families with the maximum flexibility practicable in the method of application submission, consistent with verification, privacy, and administrative requirements.(b) Upon ((satisfaction of))verification that the requirements of subsection (1)(b) and (c) of this section have been satisfied, the school district shall finalize the enrollment of ((children of military families))the child of a military family.(3) In the case of a child of a military family who had an individualized education program or plan developed under section 504 of the federal rehabilitation act of 1973 in effect in another state, the school district shall:(a) Take the necessary steps to accept the transfer of the child's educational records, including any prior evaluations;(b) Upon enrollment, provide the child with appropriate services and accommodations without unreasonable delay, including services comparable to those described in the child's previously held individualized education program or section 504 plan; and(c) If the school district determines that an evaluation is necessary, take reasonable steps to conduct the evaluation as expeditiously as practicable, consistent with applicable federal and state law.(4) A nonresident school district is not required to provide a child of a military family with transportation to and from the resident school district unless otherwise required by state or federal law.(5) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(a) "Active duty" has the same meaning as in RCW 28A.705.010.(b) "Child of a military family" and "((children of military families))child" have the same meaning as "children of military families" in RCW 28A.705.010.(c) "Military installation" has the same meaning as in RCW 28A.705.010.(d) "Parent" means a parent, guardian, or other person or entity having legal custody of a child of a military family.--- END ---